Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article X. Taxation and Finance.

§ 1. Taxable property; uniformity; classification and segregation.

All property, except as hereinafter provided, shall be taxed. All taxes shall be levied and collected under general laws and shall be uniform upon the same class of subjects within the territorial limits of the authority levying the tax, except that the General Assembly may provide for differences in the rate of taxation to be imposed upon real estate by a city or town within all or parts of areas added to its territorial limits, or by a new unit of general government, within its area, created by or encompassing two or more, or parts of two or more, existing units of general government. Such differences in the rate of taxation shall bear a reasonable relationship to differences between nonrevenue producing governmental services giving land urban character which are furnished in one or several areas in contrast to the services furnished in other areas of such unit of government.

The General Assembly may by general law and within such restrictions and upon such conditions as may be prescribed authorize the governing body of any county, city, town or regional government to provide for differences in the rate of taxation imposed upon tangible personal property owned by persons not less than sixty-five years of age or persons permanently and totally disabled as established by general law who are deemed by the General Assembly to be bearing an extraordinary tax burden on said tangible personal property in relation to their income and financial worth.

The General Assembly may define and classify taxable subjects. Except as to classes of property herein expressly segregated for either State or local taxation, the General Assembly may segregate the several classes of property so as to specify and determine upon what subjects State taxes, and upon what subjects local taxes, may be levied.

Cross references.

As to special laws for assessment prohibited, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 14. As to exemptions from taxation, see Va. Const., Art. X, § 6. For statutory provision relating to taxation, see Title 58.1 (§

58.1-1

et seq.). As to segregation of subjects of taxation, see §§

58.1-100

and

58.1-3000

.

Amendment ratified November 6, 1990. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1989 Session (Acts 1989, c. 673), and referred to the 1990 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1990, cc. 304 and 884) and submitted to the people Nov. 6, 1990, when it was ratified. The amendment inserted the present second paragraph.

Law Review.

For article, “Local Government Law in Virginia, 1870-1970,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 174 (1970).

For article, “Property Classification for Taxation,” see 43 Va. L. Rev. 1325 (1957).

For note, “Property Taxation in Virginia,” see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 589 (1977).

For survey of Virginia law on taxation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 367 (1980).

For article on state constitutional law processes, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 169 (1983).

For annual survey of Virginia law, “Local Government Law,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 175 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
2B M.J. Automobiles, § 6;
13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 117;
18 M.J. Taxation, §§ 3, 13-16, 28, 35, 39, 70, 198.

§ 2. Assessments.

All assessments of real estate and tangible personal property shall be at their fair market value, to be ascertained as prescribed by law. The General Assembly may define and classify real estate devoted to agricultural, horticultural, forest, or open space uses, and may by general law authorize any county, city, town, or regional government to allow deferral of, or relief from, portions of taxes otherwise payable on such real estate if it were not so classified, provided the General Assembly shall first determine that classification of such real estate for such purpose is in the public interest for the preservation or conservation of real estate for such uses. In the event the General Assembly defines and classifies real estate for such purposes, it shall prescribe the limits, conditions, and extent of such deferral or relief. No such deferral or relief shall be granted within the territorial limits of any county, city, town, or regional government except by ordinance adopted by the governing body thereof.

So long as the Commonwealth shall levy upon any public service corporation a State franchise, license, or other similar tax based upon or measured by its gross receipts or gross earnings, or any part thereof, its real estate and tangible personal property shall be assessed by a central State agency, as prescribed by law.

Cross references.

As to segregation of subjects of taxation, see §§

58.1-100

,

58.1-3000

.

As to different rates of levy on different classes of property, see §

58.1-3008

.

As to tangible personal property, see §§

58.1-3500

,

58.1-3503

.

Law Review.

For article, “Local Government Law in Virginia, 1870-1970,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 174 (1970).

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

For a discussion of the role of state constitutions in environmentalism, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 912 (1976).

For 1987 survey of Virginia taxation law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 837 (1987).

For annual survey article, “Taxation,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 599 (2009).

For annual survey of Virginia law, “Local Government Law,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 175 (2011).

For article, “Taxation,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
13A M.J. Mines and Minerals, § 99;
18 M.J. Taxation, §§ 15, 35, 39, 42, 61, 70.

§ 3. Taxes or assessments upon abutting property owners.

The General Assembly by general law may authorize any county, city, town, or regional government to impose taxes or assessments upon abutting property owners for such local public improvements as may be designated by the General Assembly; however, such taxes or assessments shall not be in excess of the peculiar benefits resulting from the improvements to such abutting property owners.

Cross references.

As to taxes or assessments for local improvements, see §

15.2-2404

et seq.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations and administrative law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1971).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
6B M.J. Drains, Sewers and Drainage Districts, § 7;
9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 7;
16 M.J. Special Assessments, § 3, 9, 10, 13;
18 M.J. Taxation, § 32.

§ 4. Property segregated for local taxation; exceptions.

Real estate, coal and other mineral lands, and tangible personal property, except the rolling stock of public service corporations, are hereby segregated for, and made subject to, local taxation only, and shall be assessed for local taxation in such manner and at such times as the General Assembly may prescribe by general law.

Cross references.

As to segregation of subjects of taxation, see §§

58.1-100

,

58.1-3000

.

As to real estate assessments, see §

58.1-3200

et seq.

For statutory provisions relating to mineral lands being separately and specially assessed, see §§

58.1-3286

,

58.1-3287

.

As to tangible personal property, see §

58.1-3500

et seq.

Law Review.

For article, “Property Classification for Taxation,” see 43 Va. L. Rev. 1325 (1957).

For article, “Taxation of Personal Property in Virginia,” see 44 Va. L. Rev. 127 (1958).

For survey of Virginia law on taxation for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1618 (1971).

For note, “Property Taxation in Virginia,” see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 589 (1977).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
18 M.J. Taxation, § 24.

§ 5. Franchise taxes; taxation of corporate stock.

The General Assembly, in imposing a franchise tax upon corporations, may in its discretion make the same in lieu of taxes upon other property, in whole or in part, of such corporations. Whenever a franchise tax shall be imposed upon a corporation doing business in this Commonwealth, or whenever all the capital, however invested, of a corporation chartered under the laws of this Commonwealth shall be taxed, the shares of stock issued by any such corporation shall not be further taxed.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4B M.J. Corporations, § 288;
8A M.J. Express Companies, § 2;
18 M.J. Taxation, § 34.

§ 6. Exempt property.

Except as otherwise provided in this Constitution, the following property and no other shall be exempt from taxation, State and local, including inheritance taxes:

Property owned directly or indirectly by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, and obligations of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof exempt by law.

Real estate and personal property owned and exclusively occupied or used by churches or religious bodies for religious worship or for the residences of their ministers.

Private or public burying grounds or cemeteries, provided the same are not operated for profit.

Property owned by public libraries or by institutions of learning not conducted for profit, so long as such property is primarily used for literary, scientific, or educational purposes or purposes incidental thereto. This provision may also apply to leasehold interests in such property as may be provided by general law.

Intangible personal property, or any class or classes thereof, as may be exempted in whole or in part by general law.

Property used by its owner for religious, charitable, patriotic, historical, benevolent, cultural, or public park and playground purposes, as may be provided by classification or designation by an ordinance adopted by the local governing body and subject to such restrictions and conditions as provided by general law.

Land subject to a perpetual easement permitting inundation by water as may be exempted in whole or in part by general law.

One motor vehicle owned and used primarily by or for a veteran of the armed forces of the United States or the Virginia National Guard who has been rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor agency pursuant to federal law with a one hundred percent service-connected, permanent, and total disability. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “motor vehicle” shall include only automobiles and pickup trucks. Any such motor vehicle owned by a married person may qualify if either spouse is a veteran who is one hundred percent disabled pursuant to this subdivision. This exemption shall be applicable on the date the motor vehicle is acquired or the effective date of this subdivision, whichever is later, but shall not be applicable for any period of time prior to the effective date.

The General Assembly may by general law authorize the governing body of any county, city, town, or regional government to provide for the exemption from local property taxation, or a portion thereof, within such restrictions and upon such conditions as may be prescribed, of real estate and personal property designed for continuous habitation owned by, and occupied as the sole dwelling of, persons not less than sixty-five years of age or persons permanently and totally disabled as established by general law. A local governing body may be authorized to establish either income or financial worth limitations, or both, in order to qualify for such relief.

Except as to property of the Commonwealth, the General Assembly by general law may restrict or condition, in whole or in part, but not extend, any or all of the above exemptions.

The General Assembly may define as a separate subject of taxation any property, including real or personal property, equipment, facilities, or devices, used primarily for the purpose of abating or preventing pollution of the atmosphere or waters of the Commonwealth or for the purpose of transferring or storing solar energy, and by general law may allow the governing body of any county, city, town, or regional government to exempt or partially exempt such property from taxation, or by general law may directly exempt or partially exempt such property from taxation.

The General Assembly may define as a separate subject of taxation household goods, personal effects and tangible farm property and products, and by general law may allow the governing body of any county, city, town, or regional government to exempt or partially exempt such property from taxation, or by general law may directly exempt or partially exempt such property from taxation.

Exemptions of property from taxation as established or authorized hereby shall be strictly construed; provided, however, that all property exempt from taxation on the effective date of this section shall continue to be exempt until otherwise provided by the General Assembly as herein set forth.

The General Assembly may by general law authorize any county, city, town, or regional government to impose a service charge upon the owners of a class or classes of exempt property for services provided by such governments.

The General Assembly may by general law authorize the governing body of any county, city, town, or regional government to provide for a partial exemption from local real property taxation, within such restrictions and upon such conditions as may be prescribed, (i) of real estate whose improvements, by virtue of age and use, have undergone substantial renovation, rehabilitation or replacement or (ii) of real estate with new structures and improvements in conservation, redevelopment, or rehabilitation areas.

The General Assembly may by general law allow the governing body of any county, city, or town to exempt or partially exempt from taxation any generating equipment installed after December thirty-one, nineteen hundred seventy-four, for the purpose of converting from oil or natural gas to coal or to wood, wood bark, wood residue, or to any other alternate energy source for manufacturing, and any co-generation equipment installed since such date for use in manufacturing.

The General Assembly may by general law allow the governing body of any county, city, or town to have the option to exempt or partially exempt from taxation any business, occupational or professional license or any merchants’ capital, or both.

The General Assembly may by general law authorize the governing body of any county, city, or town to provide for a partial exemption from local real property taxation, within such restrictions and upon such conditions as may be prescribed, of improved real estate subject to recurrent flooding upon which flooding abatement, mitigation, or resiliency efforts have been undertaken.

Cross references.

As to the Division of Risk Management’s risk management plan for public liability, see §

2.2-1837

. For statutory provisions regarding exemptions, see §

58.1-3600

et seq.

As to property made exempt from taxation by classification or designation by ordinance adopted by local governing body on or after January 1, 2003, see §

58.1-3651

.

As to exemptions from consumer utility taxes, see §

58.1-3816.2

.

Amendment ratified November 3, 2020. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2019 Regular Session (Acts 2019, cc. 822 and 823), and was referred to the 2020 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at the 2020 Regular Session (Acts 2020, cc. 540 and 1195) and ratified by the people on November 3, 2020. The amendment, effective January 1, 2021, added subdivision (a)(8). In subdivision (a)(8), there is a reference to “the effective date of this subdivision,” which subdivision was added January 1, 2021.

Amendment ratified November 6, 2018. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2017 Session (Acts 2017, c. 773), and was referred to the 2018 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2018, cc. 616 and 813) and submitted to the people November 6, 2018, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 2019,
added subsection (k).

Amendment ratified Nov. 2, 2010. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2009 Session (Acts 2009, c. 776) and was referred to the 2010 Regular Session.
It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2010, cc. 490, 678, 770 and 775) and submitted to the people November 2, 2010. The amendment, effective January 1, 2011, deleted “who are deemed by the General Assembly to be bearing an extraordinary tax burden on said property in relation to their income and financial worth” from the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence, of subsection (b).

Amendment ratified Nov. 7, 2006. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2005 Session (Acts 2005, cc. 947 and 948) and the 2006 Session (Acts 2006, cc. 173 and 946), and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 7, 2006. The amendment, effective January 1, 2007, in subsection (h), added the clause (i) designator and “or (ii) of real estate with new structures and improvements in conservation, redevelopment, or rehabilitation areas.”

Amendment ratified Nov. 5, 2002. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2001 Session (Acts 2001, c. 786) and the 2002 Session (Acts 2002, cc. 630 and 825) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 5, 2002. The amendment, effective January 1, 2003, substituted “an ordinance adopted by the local governing body and subject to such restrictions and conditions as provided by general law” for “a three-fourths vote of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly and subject to such restrictions and conditions as may be prescribed” at the end of subdivision (a)(6) of this section.

Amendment ratified November 3, 1998. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1997 Regular Session (Acts 1997, c. 769) and was referred to the 1998 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1998, cc. 151 and 766) and submitted to the people November 3, 1998, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 1999, added subsection (j).

Amendments ratified Nov. 4, 1980. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1979 Session (Acts 1979, c. 739) and the 1980 Session (Acts 1980, cc. 120, 762) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1980. The amendment substituted “exemption from local property taxation” for “exemption from local real property taxation” near the beginning of subsection (b), “of real estate and personal property designed for continuous habitation owned by” for “of real estate owned” near the middle of subsection (b) and “tax burden on said property” for “tax burden on said real estate” near the end of subsection (b).

A second amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1979 Session (Acts 1979, c. 740) and the 1980 Session (Acts 1980, cc. 80, 761) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1980. The amendment added subsection (i).

Amendment ratified November 7, 1978. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1977 Session (Acts 1977, c. 686), and referred to the 1978 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1978, cc. 261, 851) and submitted to the people on Nov. 7, 1978, when it was ratified. The amendment added subsection (h).

Amendment ratified November 2, 1976. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1975 Session (Acts 1975, c. 653), and referred to the 1976 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1976, cc. 751, 782) and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1976, when it was ratified. The amendment added subdivision (7) of subsection (a), inserted “or persons permanently and totally disabled as established by general law” near the middle of subsection (b) and “or for the purpose of transferring or storing solar energy” near the middle of subsection (d), and substituted “goods, personal effects and tangible farm property and products” for “goods and personal effects” near the beginning of subsection (e).

Proposed amendments not agreed to second time. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2009 Session (Acts 2009, c. 778) and was referred to the 2010 Regular Session. At the 2010 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2007 Session (Acts 2007, c. 842) and was referred to the 2008 Session, but was not agreed to at that session.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2007 Session (Acts 2007, c. 843) and was referred to the 2008 Session, but was not agreed to at that session.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1977 Session (Acts 1977, c. 687), and referred to the 1978 Session, but was not agreed to at that session.

Law Review.

For article, “Virginia Tax Laws Affecting Churches,” see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 301 (1984).

For note on property tax exemptions for charitable, benevolent, and religious organizations in Virginia, see 71 Va. L. Rev. 601 (1985).

For article, “Property Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 777 (2001).

For 2003/2004 survey of the law of taxation, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 413 (2004).

For article, “Taxation,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
5A M.J. Counties, § 38;
16 M.J. Religious Societies, § 3;
16 M.J. Schools, § 24;
16 M.J. Special Assessments, § 10;
18 M.J. Taxation, §§ 27, 28, 31-34, 184.

§ 6-A. Property tax exemption for certain veterans and their surviving spouses and surviving spouses of soldiers killed in action.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6, the General Assembly by general law, and within the restrictions and conditions prescribed therein, shall exempt from taxation the real property, including the joint real property of husband and wife, of any veteran who has been determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its successor agency pursuant to federal law to have a one hundred percent service-connected, permanent, and total disability, and who occupies the real property as his or her principal place of residence. The General Assembly shall also provide this exemption from taxation for real property owned by the surviving spouse of a veteran who was eligible for the exemption provided in this subdivision, so long as the surviving spouse does not remarry. This exemption applies to the surviving spouse’s principal place of residence without any restriction on the spouse’s moving to a different principal place of residence.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6, the General Assembly by general law, and within the restrictions and conditions prescribed therein, may exempt from taxation the real property of the surviving spouse of any member of the armed forces of the United States who was killed in action as determined by the United States Department of Defense, who occupies the real property as his or her principal place of residence. The exemption under this subdivision shall cease if the surviving spouse remarries and shall not be claimed thereafter. This exemption applies regardless of whether the spouse was killed in action prior to the effective date of this subdivision, but the exemption shall not be applicable for any period of time prior to the effective date. This exemption applies to the surviving spouse’s principal place of residence without any restriction on the spouse’s moving to a different principal place of residence and without any requirement that the spouse reside in the Commonwealth at the time of death of the member of the armed forces.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Cross references.

As to exemption from taxes on property for disabled veterans, see §

58.1-3219.5

.

As to exemption from taxes on property of surviving spouses of members of the armed forces killed in action, see §

58.1-3219.9

.

Amendment ratified November 6, 2018. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2017 Session (Acts 2017, c. 770) and was referred to the 2018 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2018, cc. 421, 422, 812 and 814) and submitted to the people November 6, 2018, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 2019, deleted “and continues to occupy the real property as his or her principal place of residence” and added “This exemption applies to the surviving spouse’s principal place of residence without any restriction on the spouse’s moving to a different principal place of residence” at the end of subsection (a).

Amendment ratified November 2, 2014. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2013 Session (Acts 2013, c. 727) and was referred to the 2014 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2014, c. 757 and 775) and submitted to the people November 2, 2014, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added “and surviving spouses of soldiers killed in action” at the end of the catchline; inserted the designation “(a)” at the beginning, and substituted “in this subdivision” for “in this section” in the last sentence, of the paragraph; and added subsection (b).

Amendment ratified November 2, 2010. —

An amendment to the constitution was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2009 Session (Acts 2009, cc. 775 and 777) and was referred to the 2010 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2010, cc. 358, 588, 771 and 773) and submitted to the people November 2, 2010, when it was ratified. The amendment added the section as set out above, effective January 1, 2011.

Law Review.

For article, “Taxation,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2019).

For article, “From Animal Control to Zoning: 2019 Local Government Law Update,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 205 (2019).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Applicability. —

The real property tax exemption provided for in §

58.1-3219.9

is applicable to the surviving spouses of members of the armed forces who are killed in action, regardless of the member’s date of death.
The exemption applies for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2015. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Priscilla S. Bele, Commissioner of the Revenue, City of Newport News, 15-056, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (12/18/15).

Effective date. —

The effective date of Va. Const., Art. X, § 6-A, as approved by the voters on November 2, 2010, is January 1, 2011. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Delegate O’Bannon, Senators Puller and Newman, and Delegate Lingamfelter, 11-061, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 51 (7/15/11).

Rules and regulations. —

The General Assembly may enact legislation authorizing the Commissioner of Department of Veterans Services to promulgate rules and regulations governing the administration and/or implementation of this tax exemption. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Delegate O’Bannon, Senators Puller and Newman, and Delegate Lingamfelter, 11-061, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 51 (7/15/11).

Real property. —

Tax relief afforded pursuant to Va. Const., Art. X, § 6-A, as implemented by §§

58.1-3219.5

and

58.1-3219.6

, is not available when the real estate is held in trust. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Delegate O’Bannon, Senators Puller and Newman, and Delegate Lingamfelter, 11-061, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 51 (7/15/11).

The real property tax exemption created by Va. Const., Art. X, § 6-A, as implemented by §§

58.1-3219.5

and

58.1-3219.6

, is exclusive to the property the veteran qualified for and occupied as his or her principal place of residence at the time of death, and does not follow the spouse if he or she decides to relocate. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Delegate O’Bannon, Senators Puller and Newman, and Delegate Lingamfelter, 11-061, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 51 (7/15/11).

No exemption to proprietary lessee. —

The exemption from taxation under Article X, § 6-A and § 55-3219.5 does not apply to a veteran who is a proprietary lessee in a real estate cooperative, regardless of whether the veteran otherwise satisfies all of the other requirements imposed by law to claim the exemption. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Jerald D. Banagan, Real Estate Assessor, City of Virginia Beach, 11-056, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 44 (12/21/12).

Exemption for disabled veterans. —

The exemption for disabled veterans provided in Article X, § 6-A does extend to a qualifying veteran who holds a life estate in the real property. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Priscilla S. Bele, Commissioner of the Revenue, City of Newport News, The Honorable Robert S. Wertz, Jr., Commissioner of the Revenue, Loudoun County, Larry W. Davis, Esquire, County Attorney for Albemarle County, 13-070, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 101 (12/27/13).

Refunds. —

The locality is not liable for any interest on any refund due to the veteran for taxes paid prior to the veteran’s filing of the required affidavit or written statement. Further, an erroneous assessment arising from a mistake of a taxpayer is entitled to administrative correction under §

58.1-3980

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Priscilla S. Bele, Commissioner of the Revenue, City of Newport News, 16-060, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 19 (6/22/17).

§ 6-B. Property tax exemptions for spouses of certain emergency services providers.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6, the General Assembly by general law, and within the restrictions and conditions prescribed therein, may provide for a local option to exempt from taxation the real property of the surviving spouse of any law-enforcement officer, firefighter, search and rescue personnel, or emergency medical services personnel who was killed in the line of duty, who occupies the real property as his or her principal place of residence. The exemption under this section shall cease if the surviving spouse remarries and shall not be claimed thereafter. This exemption applies regardless of whether the spouse was killed in the line of duty prior to the effective date of this section, but the exemption shall not be applicable for any period of time prior to the effective date. This exemption applies to the surviving spouse’s principal place of residence without any restriction on the spouse’s moving to a different principal place of residence and without any requirement that the spouse reside in the Commonwealth at the time of death of the law-enforcement officer, firefighter, search and rescue personnel, or emergency medical services personnel.

Amendment ratified November 8, 2016. —

This section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2015 Regular Session (Acts 2015, c. 718) and was referred to the 2016 Regular Session.
It was again agreed to at the 2016 session (Acts 2016, cc. 17 and 734) and was submitted to the people on November 8, 2016, when it was ratified. The amendment is effective January 1, 2017.

Law Review.

For article, “Taxation,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2019).

§ 7. Collection and disposition of State revenues.

All taxes, licenses, and other revenues of the Commonwealth shall be collected by its proper officers and paid into the State treasury. No money shall be paid out of the State treasury except in pursuance of appropriations made by law; and no such appropriation shall be made which is payable more than two years and six months after the end of the session of the General Assembly at which the law is enacted authorizing the same.

Other than as may be provided for in the debt provisions of this Constitution, the Governor, subject to such criteria as may be established by the General Assembly, shall ensure that no expenses of the Commonwealth be incurred which exceed total revenues on hand and anticipated during a period not to exceed the two years and six months period established by this section of the Constitution.

Cross references.

As to payment of funds into state treasury, see §§

2.2-1802

,

58.1-13

.

As to appropriations, see §

2.2-1819

.

As to application of project-specific federal highway reimbursements to state treasury, see §

33.2-1520

.

Amendment ratified. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1983 Session (Acts 1983, c. 625), and the 1984 Session (Acts 1984, cc. 737, 757, 758) and was ratified by the people at the general election held November 6, 1984. The amendment added the second paragraph.

Proposed amendments not agreed to by General Assembly. —

Two identical amendments to this section were proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1981 Session (Acts 1981, cc. 642, 644), and referred to the 1982 Session. At the 1982 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendments.

Law Review.

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
16 M.J. Schools, § 28;
17 M.J. State, § 5.

§ 7-A. Lottery Proceeds Fund; distribution of lottery revenues.

The General Assembly shall establish the Lottery Proceeds Fund. The Fund shall consist of the net revenues of any lottery conducted by the Commonwealth. Lottery proceeds shall be appropriated from the Fund to the Commonwealth’s counties, cities and towns, and the school divisions thereof, to be expended for the purposes of public education.

Any county, city, or town which accepts a distribution from the Fund shall provide its portion of the cost of maintaining an educational program meeting the standards of quality prescribed pursuant to Section 2 of Article VIII of this Constitution without the use of distributions from the Fund.

The General Assembly shall enact such laws as may be necessary to implement the Fund and the provisions of this section.

The General Assembly may appropriate amounts from the Fund for other purposes only by a vote of four-fifths of the members voting in each house, the name of each member voting and how he voted to be recorded in the journal of the house.

Cross references.

For the Virginia Lottery Fund, see §

58.1-4022

et seq.

Enactment ratified November 7, 2000. —

A constitutional amendment adding a new section 7-A was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1999 Regular Session (Acts 1999, cc. 933 and 934) and at the 2000 Session (Acts 2000, cc. 622, 713, 1015, and 1017), and was ratified by the people at the general election held November 7, 2000. The enactment is effective July 1, 2001.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Absent an affirmative vote of four-fifths of the members voting in each house,

any budget/appropriation item diverting lottery funds would be unconstitutional. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William T. Bolling, Lieutenant Governor 08-024 (/08).

This section mandates that the General Assembly establish a Lottery Proceeds Fund

into which net lottery proceeds are deposited and appropriate the amounts in that fund directly to counties, cities, and towns and the school divisions thereof. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Stephen D. Newman, The Honorable Walter A. Stosch, and The Honorable William C. Wampler, Jr., Members, Senate of Virginia, 08-023 (3/4/08).

Teachers in private preschools. —

Teachers in private preschools must have teacher licenses in order to be paid with public funds, which include the Lottery Proceeds Fund.
The Lottery Proceeds Fund legally may be used to fund the Virginia Preschool Initiative in all nonsectarian preschools, subject only to such restrictions and requirements as may apply to public funding of preschools. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable R. Steven Landes, Member, House of Delegates, 16-004, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 10 (/16).

§ 7-B. Transportation Funds.

Proposed amendment not agreed to second time at the 2018 Session. —

This section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2017 Session (Acts 2017, c. 771), and was referred to the 2018 Regular Session. At the 2018 Regular Session, the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.